District of Columbia statutes.
23-1330

Contempt.

Nothing in this subchapter shall interfere with or prevent the exercise by any court of the United States of its power to punish for contempt.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 649, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)

Cross References

Contempt power of Superior Court, see § 11-944.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 23-1330.
1973 Ed., § 23-1330.